Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX B or      bamurve         eor       
SFX B or      bamini          eor       
SFX B or      baminique       eor       
SFX B or      baminine        eor       
SFX B or      baminive        eor       
SFX B or      bantur          eor       
SFX B or      banturque       eor       
SFX B or      banturne        eor       
SFX B or      banturve        eor       
SFX B or      bor             eor       
SFX B or      borque          eor       
SFX B or      borne           eor       
SFX B or      borve           eor       
SFX B or      beris           eor       
SFX B or      berisque        eor       
SFX B or      berisne         eor       
SFX B or      berisve         eor       
SFX B or      bitur           eor       
SFX B or      biturque        eor       
SFX B or      biturne         eor       
SFX B or      biturve         eor       
SFX B or      bimur           eor       
SFX B or      bimurque        eor       
SFX B or      bimurne         eor       
SFX B or      bimurve         eor       
SFX B or      bimini          eor       
SFX B or      biminique       eor       
SFX B or      biminine        eor       
SFX B or      biminive        eor       
SFX B or      buntur          eor       
SFX B or      bunturque       eor       
SFX B or      bunturne        eor       
SFX B or      bunturve        eor       
SFX B or      ar              eor       
SFX B or      arque           eor       
SFX B or      arne            eor       
SFX B or      arve            eor       
SFX B or      aris            eor       
SFX B or      arisque         eor       
SFX B or      arisne          eor       
SFX B or      arisve          eor       
SFX B or      atur            eor       
SFX B or      aturque         eor       
SFX B or      aturne          eor       
SFX B or      aturve          eor       
SFX B or      amur            eor       
SFX B or      amurque         eor       
SFX B or      amurne          eor       
SFX B or      amurve          eor       
SFX B or      amini           eor       
SFX B or      aminique        eor       
SFX B or      aminine         eor       
SFX B or      aminive         eor       
SFX B or      antur           eor       
SFX B or      anturque        eor       
SFX B or      anturne         eor       
SFX B or      anturve         eor       
SFX B or      rer             eor       
SFX B or      rerque          eor       
SFX B or      rerne           eor       
SFX B or      rerve           eor       
SFX B or      reris           eor       
SFX B or      rerisque        eor       
SFX B or      rerisne         eor       
SFX B or      rerisve         eor       
SFX B or      retur           eor       
SFX B or      returque        eor       
SFX B or      returne         eor       
SFX B or      returve         eor       
SFX B or      remur           eor       
SFX B or      remurque        eor       
SFX B or      remurne         eor       
SFX B or      remurve         eor       
SFX B or      remini          eor       
SFX B or      reminique       eor       
SFX B or      reminine        eor       
SFX B or      reminive        eor       
SFX B or      rentur          eor       
SFX B or      renturque       eor       
SFX B or      renturne        eor       
SFX B or      renturve        eor       
SFX B or      re              eor       
SFX B or      reque           eor       
SFX B or      rene            eor       
SFX B or      reve            eor       
SFX B or      tor             eor       
SFX B or      torque          eor       
SFX B or      torne           eor       
SFX B or      torve           eor       
SFX B or      ntor            eor       
SFX B or      ntorque         eor       
SFX B or      ntorne          eor       
SFX B or      ntorve          eor       
SFX B or      ri              eor       
SFX B or      rique           eor       
SFX B or      rine            eor       
SFX B or      rive            eor       
SFX B or      ns              eor       
SFX B or      nsque           eor       
SFX B or      nsne            eor       
SFX B or      nsve            eor       
SFX B or      ntem            eor       
SFX B or      ntemque         eor       
SFX B or      ntemne          eor       
SFX B or      ntemve          eor       
SFX B or      ntis            eor       
SFX B or      ntisque         eor       
SFX B or      ntisne          eor       
SFX B or      ntisve          eor       
SFX B or      nti             eor       
SFX B or      ntique          eor       
SFX B or      ntine           eor       
SFX B or      ntive           eor       
SFX B or      nte             eor       
SFX B or      nteque          eor       
SFX B or      ntene           eor       
SFX B or      nteve           eor       
SFX B or      ntes            eor       
SFX B or      ntesque         eor       
SFX B or      ntesne          eor       
SFX B or      ntesve          eor       
SFX B or      ntium           eor       
SFX B or      ntiumque        eor       
SFX B or      ntiumne         eor       
SFX B or      ntiumve         eor       
SFX B or      ntibus          eor       
SFX B or      ntibusque       eor       
SFX B or      ntibusne        eor       
SFX B or      ntibusve        eor       
SFX B or      ntia            eor       
SFX B or      ntiaque         eor       
SFX B or      ntiane          eor       
SFX B or      ntiave          eor       
SFX B or      ndum            eor       
SFX B or      ndumque         eor       
SFX B or      ndumne          eor       
SFX B or      ndumve          eor       
SFX B or      ndi             eor       
SFX B or      ndique          eor       
SFX B or      ndine           eor       
SFX B or      ndive           eor       
SFX B or      ndo             eor       
SFX B or      ndoque          eor       
SFX B or      ndone           eor       
SFX B or      ndove           eor       
SFX B or      ndus            eor       
SFX B or      ndusque         eor       
SFX B or      ndusne          eor       
SFX B or      ndusve          eor       
SFX B or      nde             eor       
SFX B or      ndeque          eor       
SFX B or      ndene           eor       
SFX B or      ndeve           eor       
SFX B or      nda             eor       
SFX B or      ndaque          eor       
SFX B or      ndane           eor       
SFX B or      ndave           eor       
SFX B or      ndam            eor       
SFX B or      ndamque         eor       
SFX B or      ndamne          eor       
SFX B or      ndamve          eor       
SFX B or      ndae            eor       
SFX B or      ndaeque         eor       
SFX B or      ndaene          eor       
SFX B or      ndaeve          eor       
SFX B or      ndos            eor       
SFX B or      ndosque         eor       
SFX B or      ndosne          eor       
SFX B or      ndosve          eor       
SFX B or      ndorum          eor       
SFX B or      ndorumque       eor       
SFX B or      ndorumne        eor       
SFX B or      ndorumve        eor       
SFX B or      ndis            eor       
SFX B or      ndisque         eor       
SFX B or      ndisne          eor       
SFX B or      ndisve          eor       
SFX B or      ndas            eor       
SFX B or      ndasque         eor       
SFX B or      ndasne          eor       
SFX B or      ndasve          eor       
SFX B or      ndarum          eor       
SFX B or      ndarumque       eor       
SFX B or      ndarumne        eor       
SFX B or      ndarumve        eor       
SFX B o       o               io        
SFX B o       s               io        
SFX B o       sque            io        
SFX B o       sne             io        
SFX B o       sve             io        
SFX B o       t               io        
SFX B o       tque            io        
SFX B o       tne             io        
SFX B o       tve             io        
SFX B o       mus             io        
