Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abduco/B
abicio/B
abiicio/B
abnuo/B
abrado/B
abrumpo/B
abscido/B
abscondo/B
absolvo/B
absterreo/B
abstraho/B
absumo/B
accedo/B
accerso/B
accingo/B
accolo/B
accurro/B
acquiro/B
adaugeo/B
adcresco/B
addico/B
addo/B
adfero/B
adfigo/B
adfligo/B
adfundo/B
adgnosco/B
adhaereo/B
adhibeo/B
adicio/B
adiicio/B
adipiscor/B
adlabor/B
adlino/B
adluo/B
admitto/B
admoveo/B
adnitor/B
adpendo/B
adprenhendo/B
adrepo/B
adscribo/B
adsoleo/B
adstupeo/B
adtraho/B
adveho/B
advolvo/B
affligo/B
ago/B
allabor/B
alluo/B
amburo/B
ango/B
annitor/B
antefero/B
appendo/B
apprehendo/B
ardeo/B
arrideo/B
ascisco/B
assequor/B
assoleo/B
assurgo/B
attero/B
attraho/B
aufero/Bq
aveho/B
cado/B
calleo/B
capesso/B
caveo/B
cieo/B
circumcludo/B
circumflecto/B
circumiicio/B
circumsedeo/B
circumspicio/B
circundo/B
clepo/B
coassumo/B
cognosco/B
coicio/B
collibeo/B
comburo/B
comminuo/B
commoneo/B
compatior/B
compingo/B
complettor/B
comprehendo/B
concedo/B
concipio/B
concumbo/B
condescendo/B
conecto/B
confingo/B
confodio/B
confundo/B
congruo/B
coniungo/B
connecto/B
conprimo/B
conrumpo/B
consequor/B
conspicio/B
construo/B
consuo/B
contemno/B
conticeo/B
contradico/B
contrapono/B
convello/B
coquo/B
corripio/B
crebresco/B
curro/B
decerpo/B
decresco/B
dedo/B
defervesco/B
defleo/B
defungor/B
deicio/B
delinquo/B
deminuo/B
demulceo/B
depello/B
depingo/B
deprendo/B
derideo/B
descisco/B
desino/B
despondeo/B
desudasco/B
detero/B
detorqueo/B
detundo/B
deveho/B
devoueo/B
differo/Bq
diffluo/B
dignosco/B
diligo/B
dimitto/B
dirimo/B
discerno/B
discribo/B
disicio/B
dispesco/B
disquiro/B
dissideo/B
distraho/B
diverto/B
duco/B
edico/B
educo/ABPS
effingo/B
effringo/B
effutio/B
eicio/B
elido/B
elugeo/B
emitto/B
emungo/B
erigo/B
ervo/B
evanesco/B
evinco/B
exardesco/B
excello/B
excipio/B
excudo/B
exequor/B
eximo/B
expavesco/B
expeto/B
expono/B
expromo/B
exsequor/B
exstinguo/B
extendo/B
extollo/B
extruo/B
facesso/B
fatisco/B
fervefacio/B
figo/B
flecto/B
foeteo/B
frigefacio/B
fulgeo/B
gaudeo/B
gigno/B
gravesco/B
hisco/B
iaceo/B
ignesco/B
illido/B
illudo/B
immineo/B
immitto/B
impermisceo/B
impleo/B
imprimo/B
incedo/B
incingo/B
increbresco/B
incutio/B
indolesco/B
infero/Bq
infligo/B
infundo/B
ingigno/B
inhaereo/B
iniicio/B
inlucesco/B
innitor/B
inrepo/B
inscribo/B
insideo/B
inspicio/B
instruo/B
insurgo/B
intendo/B
intercludo/B
interfluo/B
interiicio/B
intermitto/B
interscribo/B
intorqueo/B
introduco/B
introspicio/B
invado/B
inveterasco/B
irascor/BS
iubeo/B
labor/B
lambo/B
lego/ABPS
liqueo/B
lucrifacio/B
madeo/B
malo/Bq
marcesco/B
mergo/B
misceo/B
moleo/B
moveo/B
necto/B
niteo/B
nosco/B
obdormisco/B
oblino/B
obnitor/B
obruo/B
obstito/B
obstupesco/B
obtineo/B
obvolvo/B
occipio/B
occurro/B
offundo/B
oppeto/B
optineo/B
palleo/B
pareo/B
patefacio/B
pavefacio/B
pedo/B
pendo/B
percoquo/B
percutio/B
perfero/Bq
perfruor/B
pergo/B
perluo/B
permitto/B
perpello/B
perquiro/B
persequor/B
perstrepo/B
pertineo/B
pervado/B
peto/B
plango/B
poeniteo/B
pono/B
possideo/B
postpono/B
praecelleo/B
praecino/B
praeexisto/B
praefluo/B
praehendo/B
praemineo/B
praepatior/BS
praepono/B
praestruo/B
praeterlabor/B
praevaleo/B
prehendo/B
procido/B
prodico/B
proficio/B
profugio/B
progredior/B
prolabor/B
promitto/B
propono/B
prorvo/B
proserpo/B
protego/B
protraho/B
psallo/B
puteo/B
quatio/B
rapio/B
recenseo/B
recognosco/B
recumbo/B
reddo/B
reduco/B
refluo/B
refundo/B
reiicio/B
relinquo/B
removeo/B
reor/B
repercutio/B
repono/B
reprimo/B
rescribo/B
resolvo/B
respondeo/B
resurgo/B
retineo/B
retrocedo/B
reverto/B
revivo/B
rigesco/B
rumpo/B
satago/B
scindo/B
secedo/B
seduco/B
senesco/B
serpo/B
sisto/B
spargo/B
spondeo/B
stero/B
stringo/B
stupeo/B
subgero/B
subiicio/B
sublego/B
submoveo/B
subruo/B
subsido/B
substruo/B
subtexo/B
succedo/B
succingo/B
suesco/B
suffodio/B
summoveo/B
superfundo/B
superpono/B
suppeto/B
surripio/B
sustineo/B
tego/B
tepesco/B
terreo/B
tollo/B
torreo/B
traicio/B
transcribo/B
transfigo/B
transigo/B
transpono/B
tremo/B
tumefacio/B
turgesco/B
unguo/B
usucapio/B
valeo/B
vello/B
verro/B
video/B
vireo/B
volvo/B
incalesco/B
